Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-603
Lien; how satisfied; sale.

In accordance with the terms of the notice given as provided by section 52-601.01, a sale of the goods for reasonable value may be had to satisfy any valid claim of the claimant for which he has a lien on the goods.

Laws 1923, c. 118, § 3, p. 281;

C.S.1929, § 52-603;

R.S.1943, § 52-603;

Laws 1974, LB 960, § 2.